Maryland, session 2025, HB0027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
13–218.
(a) (1) Except in unusual circumstances and as provided in subsection [(b)]
(C) of this section, the guardian is entitled to [the same] compensation and reimbursement
for actual and necessary expenses as [the trustee of a trust] PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) No petition or hearing is required to entitle the guardian to
compensation and expenses.
(3) On the petition of any interested person and on a finding by the court
that unusual circumstances exist, the court may increase or decrease compensation.
(B) (1) (I) ACCOUNTING FROM JULY 1, 1981, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE WAS IN EXISTENCE AT THE TIME, INCOME
COMMISSIONS ARE:
1. 6% ON ALL INCOME FROM REAL ESTATE, GROUND
RENTS, AND MORTGAGES COLLECTED IN EACH YEAR; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 224 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. A. 6.5% ON THE FIRST $10,000 OF ALL OTHER
INCOME COLLECTED IN EACH YEAR;
B. 5% ON THE NEXT $10,000;
C. 4% ON THE NEXT $10,000; AND
D. 3% ON ANY REMAINDER.
(II) INCOME COMMISSIONS SHALL BE PAID FROM AND
CHARGEABLE AGAINST INCOME.
(III) INCOME COLLECTED INCLUDES A PORTION OF INCOME
PAYABLE TO A TRUSTEE BUT WITHHELD BY THE PAYOR IN COMPLIANCE WITH
REVENUE LAW.
(2) (I) ACCOUNTING FROM JULY 1, 1981, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE WAS IN EXISTENCE AT THE TIME,
COMMISSIONS ARE PAYABLE AT THE END OF EACH YEAR ON THE FAIR VALUE OF THE
CORPUS OR PRINCIPAL HELD IN THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE AT THE END OF EACH
YEAR AS FOLLOWS:
1. 0.4% ON THE FIRST $250,000;
2. 0.25% ON THE NEXT $250,000;
3. 0.15% ON THE NEXT $500,000; AND
4. 0.1% ON ANY EXCESS.
(II) CORPUS COMMISSIONS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
PAID OUT OF AND CHARGEABLE AGAINST THE CORPUS.
(III) IF A GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE TERMINATES, WITH RESPECT
TO ALL OR PART OF THE CORPUS HELD IN THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE IN THE
COURSE OF A YEAR, THE COMMISSION FOR THAT YEAR SHALL BE REDUCED OR
PRORATED ACCORDING TO THE PART OF THE YEAR ELAPSED AND THE AMOUNT OF
CORPUS AS TO WHICH THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE TERMINATES, AND BE
CHARGEABLE, FOR THAT PART OF THE YEAR, AND WITH RESPECT TO THIS PART OF
THE CORPUS, AT THE TERMINATION OF THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE, ON THE THEN
VALUE OF THE CORPUS.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(3) (I) FOR SELLING REAL OR LEASEHOLD PROPERTY, A
COMMISSION ON THE PROCEEDS OF THE SALE IS PAYABLE AT THE RATE ALLOWED
BY RULE OF COURT OR STATUTE TO GUARDIANS APPOINTED TO MAKE SALES UNDER
DECREES OR ORDERS OF THE COURT FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE REAL OR
LEASEHOLD PROPERTY IS SITUATED, OR IF THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED OUTSIDE OF
THIS STATE, FOR SELLING SIMILAR PROPERTY IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE
GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE IS BEING ADMINISTERED.
(II) THE COMMISSION DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH IS PAYABLE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE SALE WHEN
COLLECTED.
(4) (I) ON THE FINAL DISTRIBUTION OF A GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE
OR PORTION OF A GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE, AN ALLOWANCE IS PAYABLE
COMMENSURATE WITH THE LABOR AND RESPONSIBILITY INVOLVED IN MAKING THE
DISTRIBUTION, INCLUDING THE MAKING OF A DIVISION, THE ASCERTAINMENT OF
THE PARTIES ENTITLED TO THE DISTRIBUTION, THE ASCERTAINMENT AND
PAYMENT OF TAXES, AND ANY NECESSARY TRANSFER OF ASSETS.
(II) THE ALLOWANCE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH IS SUBJECT TO REVISION OR DETERMINATION BY A COURT
HAVING JURISDICTION.
(III) IN THE ABSENCE OF SPECIAL CIRCUMSTANCES, THE
ALLOWANCE DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
EQUAL TO 0.5% OF THE FAIR VALUE OF THE CORPUS THAT IS DISTRIBUTED.
(5) A GUARDIAN MAY PETITION THE COURT FOR THE COUNTY WHERE
THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE IS LOCATED AND OBTAIN APPROVAL FOR AN INCREASE
IN FEES AFTER GIVING NOTICE OF THE ACTION TO THE INTERESTED PARTIES OF THE
GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE.
(6) THE LEGAL AND COURT COSTS INCURRED BY THE GUARDIAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A COURT REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE CHARGED AGAINST FEES OF THE GUARDIAN AND MAY NOT BE ASSUMED
BY THE GUARDIANSHIP ESTATE OR THE INTERESTED PARTIES.
[(b)] (C) If the guardian is appointed as the guardian of a disabled person who
is a recipient of long–term care services and supports under the Maryland Medical
Assistance Program and whose income is subject to § 15–122.3 of the Health – General
Article, the guardian is not entitled to receive more than $50 per month in compensation
unless the court makes a finding that unusual circumstances exist.
– 3 –

Ch. 224 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14.5–708.
[(a) (1) (i) A testamentary trustee and trustee of any other trust whose
duties comprise the collection and distribution of income from property held under a trust
agreement or the preservation and distribution of the property are entitled to commissions
provided for in this section for services in administering the trusts.
(ii) The amount and source of payment of commissions are subject to
the provisions of any valid agreement.
(iii) A court having jurisdiction over the administration of the trust
may increase or diminish commissions for sufficient cause or may allow special
commissions or compensation for services of an unusual nature.
(2) A schedule of increased rates of income commissions and corpus
commissions may be charged by a trustee whose activities are subject to State or federal
supervision or that is a member of the Maryland Bar and who has:
(i) Filed a schedule of the increased rates of commissions with an
appropriate agency; and
(ii) Given notice of the scheduled rates or revisions to the qualified
beneficiaries of the affected trust.
(3) The notice required under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be
delivered to the qualified beneficiaries personally or sent to the qualified beneficiaries at
their last known address by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested.
(b) (1) Accounting from July 1, 1981, regardless of whether the trust was in
existence at that time, income commissions are:
(i) 6% on all income from real estate, ground rents, and mortgages
collected in each year; and
(ii) 1. 6.5% on the first $10,000 of all other income collected in
each year;
2. 5% on the next $10,000;
3. 4% on the next $10,000; and
4. 3% on any remainder.
(2) (i) Income commissions shall be paid from and chargeable against
income.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(ii) Income collected includes a portion of income payable to a trustee
but withheld by the payor in compliance with revenue law.
(c) (1) Accounting from July 1, 1981, regardless of whether the trust was in
existence at that time, commissions are payable at the end of each year on the fair value of
the corpus or principal held in trust at the end of each year as follows:
(i) 0.4% on the first $250,000;
(ii) 0.25% on the next $250,000;
(iii) 0.15% on the next $500,000; and
(iv) 0.1% on any excess.
(2) Corpus commissions under this subsection shall be paid out of and
chargeable against the corpus.
(3) If a trust terminates, with respect to all or part of the corpus held in
trust in the course of a year, the commission for that year shall be reduced or prorated
according to the part of the year elapsed and the amount of corpus as to which the trust
terminates, and be chargeable, for that part of the year, and with respect to this part of the
corpus, at the termination of the trust, on the then value of the corpus.
(d) (1) For selling real or leasehold property, a commission on the proceeds of
the sale is payable at the rate allowed by rule of court or statute to trustees appointed to
make sales under decrees or orders of the circuit court for the county where the real or
leasehold property is situated, or if the property is located outside Maryland, for selling
similar property in the county where the trust is being administered.
(2) The commission described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is payable
from the proceeds of the sale when collected.
(e) (1) On the final distribution of a trust estate or a portion of a trust estate,
an allowance is payable commensurate with the labor and responsibility involved in
making the distribution, including the making of a division, the ascertainment of the
parties entitled to the distribution, the ascertainment and payment of taxes, and any
necessary transfer of assets.
(2) The allowance described in paragraph (1) of this subsection is subject
to revision or determination by a circuit court having jurisdiction.
(3) In the absence of special circumstances, the allowance described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be equal to 0.5% of the fair value of the corpus that
is distributed.]
– 5 –

Ch. 224 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) IF THE TERMS OF A TRUST DO NOT SPECIFY A TRUSTEE’S
COMPENSATION, THE TRUSTEE IS ENTITLED TO COMPENSATION THAT IS
REASONABLE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(2) IF THE TERMS OF A TRUST SPECIFY A TRUSTEE’S COMPENSATION,
THE TRUSTEE IS ENTITLED TO BE COMPENSATED AS SPECIFIED IN THE TERMS, BUT
THE COURT MAY AUTHORIZE MORE OR LESS COMPENSATION IF:
(I) THE DUTIES OF THE TRUSTEE ARE SUBSTANTIALLY
DIFFERENT FROM THOSE CONTEMPLATED WHEN THE TRUST WAS FIRST CREATED;
OR
(II) THE COMPENSATION SPECIFIED BY THE TERMS OF THE
TRUST WOULD BE UNREASONABLY LOW OR HIGH.
(3) IF THE TRUSTEE HAS RENDERED OTHER SERVICES IN
CONNECTION WITH THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE TRUST, THE TRUSTEE SHALL ALSO
BE ALLOWED REASONABLE COMPENSATION FOR THE OTHER SERVICES RENDERED
IN ADDITION TO REASONABLE COMPENSATION AS TRUSTEE.
(B) IN DETERMINING WHETHER A TRUSTEE’S COMPENSATION IS
REASONABLE, A COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE VALUE AND CHARACTER OF THE TRUST PROPERTY;
(2) THE RISK AND RESPONSIBILITY OF ADMINISTERING THE TRUST
PROPERTY;
(3) THE TIME SPENT ON AND THE QUALITY AND CHARACTER OF THE
SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE TRUSTEE;
(4) THE CHARACTER AND COST OF SERVICES PROVIDED BY OTHERS;
(5) THE TRUSTEE’S SKILL AND EXPERIENCE;
(6) THE RESULTS OBTAINED BY THE TRUSTEE;
(7) THE TERMS OF THE TRUST; AND
(8) ANY OTHER FACTOR THE COURT CONSIDERS RELEVANT.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
[(f)] (C) (1) In determining what is a single trust for the application of the
rates provided in this section, all property held undivided under the terms of the will or
other instrument creating the trust shall be considered as a single trust.
(2) After shares have been set apart or divided in accordance with
paragraph (1) of this subsection, to be held in separate trust, each separate trust set apart
shall be considered as a single trust.
[(g)] (D) (1) [Instead of the rates of income commissions and corpus
commissions provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a] A trustee may charge
[reasonable] compensation THAT IS REASONABLE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES AND
calculated in accordance with a schedule of rates previously filed by the trustee with the
appropriate agency as specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the trustee is:
(i) A financial institution whose activities are subject to supervision
by this State or the federal government or that is an instrumentality of the United States;
or
(ii) A member of the Maryland Bar.
(2) A trustee shall file a schedule of rates under this subsection as follows:
(i) For a savings and loan association, with the State Director of the
Division of Savings and Loan Associations;
(ii) For all other trustees, including attorneys and State chartered
and national banks, with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation; and
(iii) For a trustee administering an estate under the jurisdiction of a
court, in addition to the filing described in item (i) or (ii) of this paragraph, with the trust
clerk of the court.
(3) In a trust involving multiple trustees in which more than one of the
trustees may be entitled to file a schedule of [increased] rates, the controlling schedule will
be the schedule filed by the trustee having custody of the assets and maintaining records
of the trust.
(4) (i) On the filing by a trustee of a schedule of [increased] rates under
this subsection, the trustee shall give notice to the qualified beneficiaries of each affected
trust.
(ii) The notice required under this paragraph shall be delivered to
the qualified beneficiaries personally or sent to the qualified beneficiaries at the last known
address of the qualified beneficiaries by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt
requested.
– 7 –

Ch. 224 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) A qualified beneficiary of a trust that objects to the schedule of
rates to be charged to that trust, after notifying the trustee of the objection, may petition
the appropriate circuit court to review the reasonableness of the rates to be charged.
(iv) The notice required by this paragraph shall include a clear
statement of the rights and procedures available to qualified beneficiaries under this
subsection.
(v) If the court finds that the rates in the schedule are unreasonable
for the current fiscal year of the particular trust, the commissions of the trustee for that
trust for that fiscal year shall be limited to the rates charged that trust during the previous
fiscal year.
(5) If a trustee does not file a schedule of rates with the appropriate agency
under paragraph (2)(i) or (ii) of this subsection and does not notify qualified beneficiaries
as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the trustee is [limited to charging the rates
set forth] ENTITLED TO COMPENSATION AS PROVIDED in [subsections (b) and (c)]
SUBSECTION (A) of this section.
[(h)] (E) An individual trustee that is not authorized to file a schedule of
[increased] rates under this section is [limited to charging the rates set forth] ENTITLED
TO COMPENSATION AS PROVIDED in [subsections (b) and (c)] SUBSECTION (A) of this
section unless the trustee petitions the circuit court for the county where the trustee is
located and obtains approval [of an increase in fee] TO FILE A SCHEDULE OF RATES after
giving notice of the action to the qualified beneficiaries of the affected trusts.
[(i) The schedule of increased rates of income commissions and corpus
commissions which trustees are authorized to charge as provided in subsection (g) of this
section is not applicable to guardians.]
[(j)] (F) The legal and court costs incurred by the trustee in accordance with a
court review under subsection [(g)(4)] (D)(4) or subsection [(h)] (E) of this section shall be
charged against fees of the trustee and may not be assumed by the trust or the beneficiaries.
15–511.
A trustee shall allocate to principal:
(3) Amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of
disbursements described in [§ 15–524(a)(9)] § 15–524(A)(7) of this subtitle or for other
reasons to the extent not based on the loss of income;
15–523.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
A trustee shall make the following disbursements from income to the extent that
they are not disbursements to which § 15–503(c)(2) or (3) of this subtitle apply:
[(1) Regular compensation of the trustee on income, if determined in
accordance with § 14.5–708(b) of this article;
(2) That portion of the regular compensation of the trustee, if the
compensation is determined in a manner other than in accordance with § 14.5–708(b) and
(c) of this article, and that portion of the compensation of any person providing investment
advisory or custodial services to the trustee, as the trustee determines is fair and
reasonable in accordance with § 15–502(b) of this subtitle;]
(1) ONE–HALF OF THE REGULAR COMPENSATION OF THE TRUSTEE
AND ANY PERSON PROVIDING INVESTMENT ADVISORY OR CUSTODIAL SERVICES TO
THE TRUSTEE;
[(3)] (2) One–half of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or
other matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;
[(4)] (3) All of the other ordinary expenses incurred in connection with
the administration, management, or preservation of trust property and the distribution of
income, including interest, ordinary repairs, regularly recurring taxes assessed against
principal, and expenses of a proceeding or other matter that concerns primarily the income
interest; and
[(5)] (4) Recurring premiums on insurance covering the loss of a principal
asset or the loss of income from or use of the asset.
15–524.
(a) A trustee shall make the following disbursements from principal:
[(1) Regular compensation of the trustee on principal, if determined in
accordance with § 14.5–708(c) of this article;
(2) That portion of the regular compensation of the trustee, if the
compensation is determined in a manner other than in accordance with § 14.5–708(b) and
(c) of this article, and that portion of the compensation of any person providing investment
advisory or custodial services to the trustee, as the trustee determines is fair and
reasonable in accordance with § 15–502(b) of this subtitle;
(3) One–half of all expenses for accountings, judicial proceedings, or other
matters that involve both the income and remainder interests;]
– 9 –

Ch. 224 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE REMAINING ONE–HALF OF THE DISBURSEMENTS DESCRIBED
UNDER § 15–523(1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(4)] (2) All of the trustee’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee
for acceptance, distribution, or termination, and disbursements made to prepare property
for sale;
[(5)] (3) Payments on the principal of a trust debt;
[(6)] (4) Expenses of a proceeding that concerns primarily principal,
including a proceeding to construe the trust or to protect the trust or its property;
[(7)] (5) Premiums paid on a policy of insurance not described in [§
15–523(5)] § 15–523(4) of this subtitle of which the trust is the owner and beneficiary;
[(8)] (6) Estate, inheritance, and other transfer taxes, including
penalties, apportioned to the trust; and
[(9)] (7) Disbursements related to environmental matters, including
reclamation, assessing environmental conditions, remedying and removing environmental
contamination, monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances, preventing
future releases of substances, collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable
for the costs of those activities, penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations
and other payments made to comply with those laws or regulations, statutory or common
law claims by third parties, and defending claims based on environmental matters.
15–526.
(b) Principal disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include the following,
but only to the extent that the trustee has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed
by a third party:
(5) Disbursements described in [§ 15–524(a)(9)] § 15–524(A)(7) of this
subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 10 –